Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
§ 20-103. Court may make orders pending suit for divorce, custody or visitation, etc.

In suits for divorce, annulment and separate maintenance, and in proceedings arising under subdivision A 3 or subsection L of § 16.1-241, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may, at any time pending a suit pursuant to this chapter, in the discretion of such court, make any order that may be proper (i) to compel a spouse to pay any sums necessary for the maintenance and support of the petitioning spouse, including (a) an order that the other spouse provide health care coverage for the petitioning spouse, unless it is shown that such coverage cannot be obtained, or (b) an order that a party pay secured or unsecured debts incurred jointly or by either party, (ii) to enable such spouse to carry on the suit, (iii) to prevent either spouse from imposing any restraint on the personal liberty of the other spouse, (iv) to provide for the custody and maintenance of the minor children of the parties, including an order that either party or both parties provide health care coverage or cash medical support, or both, for the children, (v) to provide support, calculated in accordance with § 20-108.2, for any child of the parties to whom a duty of support is owed and to pay or continue to pay support for any child over the age of 18 who meets the requirements set forth in subsection C of § 20-124.2, (vi) for the exclusive use and possession of the family residence during the pendency of the suit, (vii) to preserve the estate of either spouse, so that it be forthcoming to meet any decree which may be made in the suit, (viii) to compel either spouse to give security to abide such decree, or (ix)(a) to compel a party to maintain any existing policy owned by that party insuring the life of either party or to require a party to name as a beneficiary of the policy the other party or an appropriate person for the exclusive use and benefit of the minor children of the parties and (b) to allocate the premium cost of such life insurance between the parties, provided that all premiums are billed to the policyholder. Nothing in clause (ix) shall be construed to create an independent cause of action on the part of any beneficiary against the insurer or to require an insurer to provide information relating to such policy to any person other than the policyholder without the written consent of the policyholder. The parties to any petition where a child whose custody, visitation, or support is contested shall show proof that they have attended within the 12 months prior to their court appearance or that they shall attend within 45 days thereafter an educational seminar or other like program conducted by a qualified person or organization approved by the court except that the court may require the parties to attend such seminar or program in uncontested cases only if the court finds good cause. The seminar or other program shall be a minimum of four hours in length and shall address the effects of separation or divorce on children, parenting responsibilities, options for conflict resolution and financial responsibilities. Once a party has completed one educational seminar or other like program, the required completion of additional programs shall be at the court's discretion. Parties under this section shall include natural or adoptive parents of the child, or any person with a legitimate interest as defined in § 20-124.1. The fee charged a party for participation in such program shall be based on the party's ability to pay; however, no fee in excess of $50 may be charged. Whenever possible, before participating in mediation or alternative dispute resolution to address custody, visitation or support, each party shall have attended the educational seminar or other like program. The court may grant an exemption from attendance of such program for good cause shown or if there is no program reasonably available. Other than statements or admissions by a party admitting criminal activity or child abuse, no statement or admission by a party in such seminar or program shall be admissible into evidence in any subsequent proceeding.

In addition to the terms provided in subsection A, upon a showing by a party of reasonable apprehension of physical harm to that party by such party's family or household member as that term is defined in § 16.1-228, and consistent with rules of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the court may enter an order excluding that party's family or household member from the jointly owned or jointly rented family dwelling. In any case where an order is entered under this paragraph, pursuant to an ex parte hearing, the order shall not exclude a family or household member from the family dwelling for a period in excess of 15 days from the date the order is served, in person, upon the person so excluded. The order may provide for an extension of time beyond the 15 days, to become effective automatically. The person served may at any time file a written motion in the clerk's office requesting a hearing to dissolve or modify the order. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the court from extending an order entered under this subsection for such longer period of time as is deemed appropriate, after a hearing on notice to the parties. If the party subject to the order fails to appear at this hearing, the court may extend the order for a period not to exceed six months.

In cases other than those for divorce in which a custody or visitation arrangement for a minor child is sought, the court may enter an order providing for custody, visitation or maintenance pending the suit as provided in subsection A. The order shall be directed to either parent or any person with a legitimate interest who is a party to the suit.

Orders entered pursuant to this section which provide for custody or visitation arrangements pending the suit shall be made in accordance with the standards set out in Chapter 6.1 (§ 20-124.1 et seq.). Orders entered pursuant to subsection B shall be certified by the clerk and forwarded as soon as possible to the local police department or sheriff's office which shall, on the date of receipt, enter the name of the person subject to the order and other appropriate information required by the Department of State Police into the Virginia crime information network system established and maintained by the Department of State Police pursuant to Chapter 2 (§ 52-12 et seq.) of Title 52. If the order is later dissolved or modified, a copy of the dissolution or modification shall also be certified, forwarded and entered in the system as described above.

There shall be a presumption in any judicial proceeding for pendente lite spousal support and maintenance under this section that the amount of the award that would result from the application of the formula set forth in this section is the correct amount of spousal support to be awarded. The court may deviate from the presumptive amount as provided in subsection H.

If the court is determining both an award of pendente lite spousal support and maintenance and an award of child support, the court shall first make a determination of the amount of the award of pendente lite spousal support, if any, owed by one party to the other under this section.

If the parties have minor children in common, the presumptive amount of an award of pendente lite spousal support and maintenance shall be the difference between 26 percent of the payor spouse's monthly gross income and 58 percent of the payee spouse's monthly gross income. If the parties have no minor children in common, the presumptive amount of the award shall be the difference between 27 percent of the payor spouse's monthly gross income and 50 percent of the payee spouse's monthly gross income. For the purposes of this section, monthly gross income shall have the same meaning as it does in section § 20-108.2.

The court may deviate from the presumptive amount for good cause shown, including any relevant evidence relating to the parties' current financial circumstances or the impact of any tax exemption and any credits resulting from such exemptions that indicates the presumptive amount is inappropriate.

The presumptive formula set forth in this section shall only apply to cases where the parties' combined monthly gross income does not exceed $10,000.

An order entered pursuant to this section shall have no presumptive effect and shall not be determinative when adjudicating the underlying cause.

A1.
Any award or order made by the court pursuant to subsection A shall be paid from the post-separation income of the obligor unless the court, for good cause shown, orders otherwise. Upon the request of either party, the court may identify and state in such order or award the specific source from which the financial obligation imposed is to be paid.

(Code 1919, § 5107; 1975, c. 644; 1982, c. 306; 1983, c. 253; 1989, c. 740; 1991, c. 60; 1994, cc. 518, 769; 1995, c. 674; 1996, cc. 767, 866, 879, 884; 1997, c. 605; 1998, c. 616; 2000, c. 586; 2003, cc. 31, 45; 2004, c. 732; 2007, c. 205; 2009, c. 713; 2011, c. 687; 2014, c. 55; 2015, cc. 653, 654; 2016, c. 352; 2020, c. 651.)

Cross references.

- As to temporary orders for support, see
§
20-71.

As to violation of provisions of protective orders, see
§
16.1-253.2.

As to unauthorized use of electronic tracking device, see
§
18.2-60.5.

As to trespass after having been forbidden to do so, see
§
18.2-119.

As to exclusion from access to premises following entry of court order pursuant to
§
20-103 B, see

§

55.1-1230.

Editor's note.

- Acts 2000, c. 586, cl. 2, provides that the provisions of c. 586 shall become effective on July 1, 2001.

Acts 2000, c. 586, which amended this section, provided in cl. 4: "That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2003, unless reenacted by the General Assembly." The section is set out above without the amendment by Acts 2000, c. 586.

Acts 2020, c. 651, cl. 2 provides: "That the provisions of this act shall apply only to suits commenced on or after July 1, 2020, and that the provisions of this act shall not be construed to create a material change in circumstances for the purposes of modifying an existing support order."

The 2000 amendments.

- The 2000 amendment by c. 586, effective July 1, 2001, divided subsection A into two paragraphs, and rewrote the present second paragraph of subsection A, which formerly read: "In addition to the authority hereinabove, the court may order parties with a minor child or children to attend educational seminars and other like programs conducted by a qualified person or organization approved by the court, on the effects of the separation or divorce on minor children, parenting responsibilities, options for conflict resolution, and financial responsibilities, provided that no fee in excess of fifty dollars may be charged for participation in any such program.
No statement or admission by a party in such seminar or program shall be admissible into evidence in any subsequent proceeding."

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendments by cc. 31 and 45 are identical, and rewrote subsection A; and twice substituted "15" for "fifteen" in subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

- The 2004 amendment by c. 732, in subsection A, substituted "is contested" for "is at issue for an original decision, whether contested or by agreement" and inserted "except that the court may require the parties to attend such seminar or program in uncontested cases only if the court finds good cause"; and substituted "this title" for Title 20" in subsection D.

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendment by c. 205 added the last sentence of subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 713 inserted "or both parties" and "or cash medical support, or both" in clause (iv) of subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

- The 2011 amendment by c. 687, in the first sentence in subsection A, added the clause (i)(a) designation and clause (i)(b); and in subsection D, deleted "of this title" following "(
§
20-124.1 et seq.)."

The 2014 amendments.

- The 2014 amendment by c. 55 in subsection A inserted clause (ix) in the first sentence, added the second sentence and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, and substituted "pay or continue to pay support for" for "continue to support" preceding "any" in clause (v) of subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendment by c. 352 added subsection A1.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 651, inserted subsections E through I and redesignated former subsection E as subsection J. For applicability clause, see Editor's note.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For comment on spouse abuse in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 633 (1983). As to interpretation of
§
20-103 in dealing with payments of family mortgage, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 565 (1988). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For 1995 survey of domestic relations, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 993 (1995).

For casenote & comment, "A Privilege for 'Mommy Dearest'? Criticizing Virginia's Mental Health Records Privilege in Custody Disputes and the Court's Application in Schwartz v. Schwartz," see 13 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1341 (2006).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
35, 50, 53, 66, 67, 80, 81; 14A M.J. Parent and Child,

§

4.

§ 20-104. Order of publication against nonresident defendant.

In any suit for annulment, for divorce, either a vinculo matrimonii or a mensa et thoro, or for affirmance of a marriage, an affidavit shall be filed that the defendant is not a resident of the Commonwealth of Virginia, or that diligence has been used by or on behalf of the plaintiff to ascertain in what county or city such defendant is, without effect, an order of publication shall be entered against such defendant by the court, or by the clerk of the court wherein such suit is pending, either in term time or vacation, which order shall state the object of the suit and the grounds thereof, and the order of publication shall be published as required by law. If the plaintiff in the suit has been determined to be indigent by the court pursuant to § 19.2-159, the order stating the object of the suit and the grounds thereof shall be mailed to the defendant at his last known address and posted on the main entrance to the circuit courthouse of the city or county wherein the suit is filed, and no order of publication shall be required. No depositions in the suit shall be commenced until at least 10 days shall have elapsed after the order has been duly published or mailed and posted as required by law.

All annulments or divorces heretofore granted in suits in which the defendant was proceeded against by an order of publication or of mailing and posting which required the defendant to appear within 10 days after due publication or mailing and posting thereof, and in which depositions were taken less than 15 days, but not less than 10 days, after such due publication or mailing and posting and in suits in which the defendant was proceeded against by an order of publication or of mailing and posting issued on an affidavit that diligence had been used by or on behalf of the plaintiff to ascertain in what county or city such defendant was, without effect, or wherein the order of publication or of mailing and posting was entered by the court, are hereby validated and declared to be binding upon the parties to such suit, when the other proceedings therein were regular and the annulment or divorce otherwise valid.

The cost of such publication or of such mailing and posting shall be paid by the petitioner or applicant.

(Code 1919, § 5108; 1938, p. 111; 1940, p. 642; 1942, p. 202; 1950, p. 72; 1975, c. 644; 1996, c. 352; 2008, c. 699.)

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendment by c. 699, in the first paragraph, inserted the second sentence, substituted "has been duly published or mailed and posted" for "of publication has been duly published" in the last sentence; in the second paragraph, inserted "or of mailing and posting" following "order of publication" four times, and inserted "or mailing and posting" following "after due publication"; and in the last paragraph inserted "or of such mailing and posting."

Law review.

- For discussion of the question of whether Virginia denies indigents the right to divorce, see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 735 (1978).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
37, 39; 12B M.J. Marriage,

§

18.

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Active Jurisdiction.
§
3.01 Process. Bryson.

§ 20-104.1. Orders of publication may be combined.

Orders of publication as provided for in § 20-104 in any two or more suits for annulment or divorce may be combined into a single order to be published as required by law; provided that, at such time as the clerk may direct the plaintiff in each case shall pay to the clerk a pro rata share of the expense of such publication. Payments made by any plaintiff shall be subject to the provisions of § 20-99 as to costs.

(1974, c. 581.)

§ 20-105. Permissible form for orders of publication.

Any orders of publication under the provisions of
§
20-104 may be substantially in the form following:
Virginia: In the . . . . . . . . . . . Court of . . . . . . . . . .,
. . . . . . . . . ., 20. . . .
(Here set forth Style of Cause)
The object of this suit is to obtain (an annulment of marriage) (a divorce from bed and board) (a divorce from the bond of matrimony) from the defendant on the ground of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,
(here set forth grounds)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(here set forth other relief prayed for, if any)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(here set forth the styles and objects of the suits for
divorce or annulment combined)
It appearing from an affidavit (that the defendant(s) is not a resident (are not residents) of this Commonwealth,) (or) (that diligence has been used by or on behalf of plaintiff(s) to ascertain in what county or city the defendant(s) is (are), without effect,) it is ordered that the defendant appear before this court (within ten days after due publication of this notice) (before . . . . . . . . . . . ., 20. . . .) and protect (his) (her) (their) interests herein.
An Extract-Teste:
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . p.q.
..............................................................(Clerk)

(1946, p. 272; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5108a; 1974, c. 581.)

§ 20-105.1. Alternative procedures.

The provisions of Title 8.01 for orders of publication shall be construed as alternatives to the procedures set forth in §§ 20-104 through 20-105 and not in conflict therewith.

(1978, c. 46.)

Law review.

- For discussion of the question of whether Virginia denies indigents the right to divorce, see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 735 (1978).

§ 20-106. Testimony may be required to be given orally; evidence by affidavit.

In any suit for divorce, the trial court may require the whole or any part of the testimony to be given orally in open court, and if either party desires it, such testimony and the rulings of the court on the exceptions thereto, if any, shall be reduced to writing, and the judge shall certify that such evidence was given before him and such rulings made. When so certified the same shall stand on the same footing as a deposition regularly taken in the cause, provided, however, that no such oral evidence shall be given or heard unless and until after such notice to the adverse party as is required by law to be given of the taking of depositions, or when there has been no service of process within the Commonwealth upon, or appearance by the defendant against whom such testimony is sought to be introduced. However, a party may proceed to take evidence in support of a divorce by deposition or affidavit without leave of court only in support of a divorce on the grounds set forth in subdivision A (9) of § 20-91, where (i) the parties have resolved all issues by a written settlement agreement, (ii) there are no issues other than the grounds of the divorce itself to be adjudicated, or (iii) the adverse party has been personally served with the complaint and has failed to file a responsive pleading or to make an appearance as required by law.

The affidavit of a party submitted as evidence shall be based on the personal knowledge of the affiant, contain only facts that would be admissible in court, give factual support to the grounds for divorce stated in the complaint or counterclaim, and establish that the affiant is competent to testify to the contents of the affidavit. If either party is incarcerated, neither party shall submit evidence by affidavit without leave of court or the consent in writing of the guardian ad litem for the incarcerated party, or of the incarcerated party if a guardian ad litem is not required pursuant to § 8.01-9. The affidavit shall:

Give factual support to the grounds for divorce stated in the complaint or counterclaim, including that the parties are over the age of 18 and not suffering from any condition that renders either party legally incompetent;

Verify whether either party is incarcerated;

Verify the military status of the opposing party and advise whether the opposing party has filed an answer or a waiver of his rights under the federal Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.);

Affirm that at least one party to the suit was at the time of the filing of the suit, and had been for a period in excess of six months immediately preceding the filing of the suit, a bona fide resident and domiciliary of the Commonwealth;

Affirm that the parties have lived separate and apart, continuously, without interruption and without cohabitation, and with the intent to remain separate and apart permanently, for the statutory period required by subdivision A (9) of § 20-91;

Affirm the affiant's desire to be awarded a divorce pursuant to subdivision A (9) of § 20-91; and

State whether there were children born or adopted of the marriage and affirm that neither party is known to be pregnant from the marriage.

If a party moves for a divorce pursuant to § 20-121.02, an affidavit may be submitted in support of the grounds for divorce set forth in subdivision A (9) of § 20-91.

A verified complaint shall not be deemed an affidavit for purposes of this section.

Either party may submit the deposition or affidavit required by this section in support of the grounds for divorce requested by either party pursuant to the terms of this section.

In contemplation of or in a suit for a no-fault divorce under subdivision A (9) of § 20-91, the plaintiff or his attorney may take and file, as applicable, the complaint, the affidavit or deposition, any other associated documents, and the proposed decree contemporaneously, and a divorce may be granted solely on those documents where the defendant has waived service and, where applicable, notice.

(Code 1919, § 5109; 1932, p. 388; 2012, c. 72; 2014, cc. 288, 521; 2015, c. 315; 2016, c. 238; 2019, cc. 133, 237; 2020, c. 900; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 194.)

Editor's note.

- At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, "50 U.S.C.
§
3901 et seq." was substituted for "50 U.S.C. App.

§

501 et seq." to conform to amendments by Acts 2016, c. 643.

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendment by c. 72 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsections B and C; and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

- The 2014 amendment by c. 288, substituted "grounds for divorce stated" for "allegations" and added the second sentence in subsection B; substituted "Give factual support to the grounds for divorce stated" for "Affirm the allegations" in subdivision B 1; substituted "Verify whether either" for "Affirm that neither" in subdivision B 2; substituted "whether either party" for "that neither party" in subdivision B 8 b; and substituted "Give factual support to the grounds for divorce stated" for "Verify the allegations" in subdivision B 8 c.

The 2014 amendment by c. 521 in subdivisions B 4 and B 8 d inserted "immediately preceding the commencement of the suit."

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 315 in subdivisions B 4 and B 8 d, substituted "was at the time of the filing of the suit, and had been" for "is, and has been" and "filing" for "commencement"; substituted "at least one" for "a" in subdivision B 8; substituted "either party's intention" for "the moving party's intention" in subdivision B 8 f; added subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendment by c. 238 added subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

- The 2019 amendments by cc. 133 and 237 are identical, and added subsection F.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 in subsection A, substituted "the Commonwealth" for "this Commonwealth" in the second sentence; and in subdivision B 7 and in subdivision B 8 e, substituted "neither party is known" for "the wife is not known."

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

- The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 194, effective July 1, 2021, deleted subdivision B 8, pertaining to the requirements for an affidavit of a corroborating witness; in subsection C, substituted "an affidavit" for "any affidavit"; substituted "deposition or affidavit" for "depositions or affidavits" in subsections E and F.

Law review.

- For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Active Jurisdiction.
§
3.01 Process. Bryson.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
34, 39; 7A M.J. Equity,

§

146.

§ 20-107.

Repealed by Acts 1982, c. 309.

Cross references.

- For provision regarding the court's decree as to maintenance and support of spouses, see
§
20-107.1.

For provision as to the court's decree as to the custody and support of children, see
§
20-107.2.

For provision regarding the court's decree as to property of the parties, see
§
20-107.3.